Hawaii statutes.
§88-88 Adjustment of retirement allowances
of retirants. The retirement allowance of any class A member whose
allowance was reduced by reason of social security coverage subsequent to
December 31, 1955, shall be increased by the amount of such reduction;
provided that the increase shall be limited to 1/280 of that part of the class
A member's average final compensation not in excess of $4,200 per annum
multiplied by the number of years of the class A member's creditable service
rendered between January 1, 1956, and January 1, 1965, for which the
class A member received compensation covered by social security, and provided
that in the case of a member who retired on a service-connected disability
retirement the increase shall be limited to 16 and 2/3 per cent of that part of
the member's average final compensation not in excess of $4,200 per year. [L
1969, c 102, §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next